src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! # The Apurinã morphophonological/twolc rules file 
!! =================================== !

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-apu/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 
 ã ẽ ĩ ũ ỹ

 á é ó ú í õ
 ç ɨ ʃ ɾ

 ɨ̃ ! U+0268 LATIN SMALL LETTER I WITH STROKE PLUS U+0303 COMBINING TILDE

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
 Ã Ẽ Ĩ Ũ Ỹ

 Á É Ó Ú Í Õ
 Ç

!! we do not declare compound letters here, e.g., nh, th, ts, tx
!! these would be declared in CLDR and there perspective ordering

%{hØ%}:0 !
%{hØ%}:h !
%{yiØ%}:y !
%{yiØ%}:ỹ !
%{yiØ%}:i !
%{yiØ%}:0 !
%{ỹĩØ%}:ỹ !
%{ỹĩØ%}:ĩ !
%{ỹĩØ%}:0 !
%{uũ%}:u !
%{uũ%}:ũ !
%{aã%}:a !
%{aã%}:ã !

%^VowRM:0  !!= **@CODE@** this will remove stem final vowel
%^VowNasL:0 !!= **@CODE@** This will nasalize preceding vowel
%^VowY2I:0 !!= **@CODE@** This will change stem-final y to i
%^I1:0	 !!= **@CODE@** This will cause %{yiØ%}:i before all consonants

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


 %>
 %<
 #
 «
 »

;

Sets

 Vow = a e i u y ã ẽ ĩ ũ ỹ ;
 NVow = ã ẽ ĩ ũ ỹ ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;
 NCns = m n ;
 Ltrs = Vow Cns;

Definitions

PALCns = [n h | x | t x |  t h ] ;
!PALCns = [n h | x | t x | t s | t h ] ;2025-03-25 ?j

NonPALCns = [n [Vow | Cns - [h]]  | Cns - [x|n|t] | t [Cns - [x | s | h] | Vow ] ] ;
NonPALNonNAS = [ Cns - [x|n|m|t|k] | t [Cns - [x | s | h] | Vow ] | n [Cns - [h] | Vow ] | k [Vow - i]| k i Cns [Vow - i] ] ;
!NonPALNonNAS = [ Cns - [x|n|m|t|k] | t [Cns - [x | s | h] | n | k [Vow - i]| k i Cns [Vow - i]| Vow ] ] ;

Rules

"Deleting %{hØ%}"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
  %{hØ%}:0 <=> n _ [%{yiØ%}:y %< NonPALCns | %{yiØ%}:0 %< [Vow - i] ] ;
           %{yiØ%}: %< _ NVow: ;
!! arika+V+ScSg1+Oc3F: **set on fire/queimar**
!!€ n{hØ}{yiØ}<arika>ru
!!€ n00<arika>ru
!!$ n{hØ}{yiØ}<arika>ru
!!$ nh0<arika>ru
!! nyrymanetxi+N+Msc+Sg+PxSg1+Possd: **relative/parente**
!! n{hØ%}{yiØ}<nyrymane
!! n0y<nyrymane
!! hỹruwa+V+Imprt+ScSg2: **enter/entrar**
!!€ p{yiØ}<{hØ}ỹruwa
!!€ py<0ỹruwa

"Deleting %{yiØ%}:0 "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{yiØ%}:0 <=> [n %{hØ%}:|p ] _ %< Vow ;
           # _ %< [Vow - NVow ];
!! apu+V+NFut+Ind+ScSg1: **arrive/chegar**
!!€ n{hØ}{yiØ}<apu
!!€ n00<apu

"Deleting %{ỹĩØ%}:0 "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{ỹĩØ%}:0 <=> h _ %< Vow ;

"Deleting stem-final a before NomAct -inhi"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 a:0 <=> _ %^VowRM: [%>|#] ;
!! myteka+V+Der+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom: **run›running/corrir›corrida** 
!!€ myteka^VowRM>inhi 
!!€ mytek00>inhi
!uwa+Pron+Pers+Sg3F+Contr#ãta+V+Der+Der/NIku+N+Msc+Sg+NPossd+Nom: **drink/beber**
!!€ uwa^VowRM#ãta^VowRM>iku
!!€ uw00#ãt00>iku
! this is an instrument ?Der/NomIns 2025-03-25, source? jmr

"Realizing %{hØ%}:h "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
  %{hØ%}:h <=> n _ [%{yiØ%}:i %< PALCns | %{yiØ%}:0 %< i ] ;
!! nhika+V+ScSg1+Oc3F: **I ate it(Fem)/eu comi isso(Fem)**
!!€ n{hØ}{yiØ}<nhika>ru
!!€ nhi<nhika>ru

"Realizing %{yiØ%}:y LEFT ARROW"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{yiØ%}:y <= [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< [NonPALNonNAS|m|%{hØ%}: ỹ]  ;
! [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< NonPALCns  ;

"Realizing %{yiØ%}:y RIGHT ARROW"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{yiØ%}:y => [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< [NonPALNonNAS|m|%{hØ%}: ỹ]  ;
! [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< NonPALCns  ;
               _ %< t x a: ;

"Realizing %{yiØ%}:i LEFT ARROW"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{yiØ%}:i <= [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< [ PALCns | [ k ] i Cns i ]  ;
           p _ %^I1:0 %< NonPALNonNAS ;

"Realizing %{yiØ%}:i RIGHT ARROW"
 %{yiØ%}:i => [n %{hØ%}: | p | # ] _ %< [ PALCns | [ k ] i Cns i ]  ;
           p _ %^I1:0 %< NonPALNonNAS ;

"Realizing %{yiØ%}:ỹ "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{ỹĩØ%}:ỹ <=> h _ %< NonPALCns  ;
 [n %{hØ%}: | p ] _ %< [m|n]  ;
         # _ %< [m|n|(%{hØ%}:) NVow:]  ;
! Facundes (2000:141) nasalization

"Realizing %{ỹĩØ%}:ĩ "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{ỹĩØ%}:ĩ <=> h _ %< PALCns  ;
          h _ %^VowY2I:0 %< NonPALCns ;
	   
"non-nasal a"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{aã%}:a <=> _ %< Cns  ; !orthographic
! _ %< [Cns| NVow ]  ; !orthographic
!2023-07-06 _ %< [Cns - NCns]  ;!Phonetic

"non-nasal u"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{uũ%}:u <=> _ %< [Cns| NVow ]  ; !orthographic
!2023-07-06 _ %< [Cns - NCns]  ;!Phonetic

"nasal ã"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
%{aã%}:ã <=> _ %< [Vow: - [ e: | ẽ: ]]  ;
! _ %< [Vow: - NVow:] ;
               _ %^VowNasL: %< NCns: ;
!2023-07-06 _ %< [Vow: |NCns] ;

"nasal ẽ"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
%{aã%}:ẽ <=> _ %< [ e: | ẽ: ]  ;
! erẽka+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: __blood/sangue__
!!€ {aã}<erẽka
!!€ ẽ<erẽka

"nasal ũ"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{uũ%}:ũ <=> _ %< [Vow: - NVow:] ;
               _ %^VowNasL: %< NCns: ;
!2023-07-06 _ %< [Vow: | NCns ]  ;

"ortho denasalization at prefix"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> [%{uũ%}:|%{aã%}:] %> _ ;
           where Vx in (ã ẽ ũ ĩ)
                 Vy in (a e u i) matched ;


"nasalization with -ka passive marker"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=>  _ %^VowNasL:0 %> ;
           where Vx in (a e u)
                 Vy in (ã ẽ ũ) matched ;

"nasalization with sg3f"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=>  _ %^VowNasL:0 %> ;
          %{uũ%}:ũ %< _ ;
           where Vx in (i)
                 Vy in (ĩ) matched ;

"nasalization with -Ntxi y:ỹ"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 y:ỹ <=> _ (y:) %^VowNasL:0 %> NonPALCns ; 

"y to i with -Y2Itxi y:i"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 y:i <=> _ %^VowY2I:0 %> t x i ; 
        y: _ %^VowNasL:0 %> PALCns ;

"nasalization with -Ntxi y:ĩ"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 y:ĩ <=>
 Cns _ %^VowNasL:0 %> PALCns ; 
  _ y: %^VowNasL:0 %> PALCns ; 
! kywy+N+Sg+Nom+NPossd: __head/cabeça__
!!€ kywy%^VowNasL%>txi
!!€ kywĩ0%>txi
! tsyy+N+Sg+Nom+NPossd: __pain/dor__
!!€ tsyy^VowNasL>txi
!!€ tsĩi0>txi

!!TESTS
!echo 'n {hØ}:0 {yiØ}:y < t a k a > r y' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'taka+V+ScSg1+OcSg3M' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst

!€ n {hØ}:0 {yiØ}:y < t a k a > r y

!DISALLOW

"Disallow %^VowNasL:0 when not followed by Nas"
%^VowNasL: /<= [%{aã%}: | %{uũ%}: ]  _ %< [Vow:| [Cns - NCns]];

"Disallow word-initial Cns in contraction with pronouns" 
Cns /<= a: %^VowRM # _ ;

"Disallow %^I1: when not followed by Cns"
%^I1: /<= _ %< [ Vow: |  PALCns ] ;

"Disallow %^VowY2I: when not followed by NonPALCns"
%^VowY2I: /<=  _ %< [ Vow: |  PALCns ] ;
